Utah statutes.
4-26-1.   Dead domestic animals -- Duty of owner to bury or otherwise dispose of them -- Liability for costs.

It is the responsibility of the owner or other person responsible for any domestic animal which dies to bury or otherwise dispose of it within two days after death. If the owner or other person responsible for such an animal cannot be found, it is the duty of the county, city, or town within which the dead animal is found, at such political subdivision's expense, to bury the dead animal. A county, city, or town which incurs expense under this section is entitled to reimbursement from the owner of the dead animal.

